en: Chocolate rolled oats biscuits
fr: Biscuits aux flocons d'avoine au chocolat

en: Oatmeal drop cookies
da: Havresmåkager
fr: Cookies à l'avoine
sv: Havresmåkakor

en: Oatmeal drop cookies with chocolate
da: Havresmåkager med chokolade
sv: Havresmåkakor med choklad

en: Filled biscuits
bg: Пълнени бисквити
de: Gefüllte Kekse
es: Galletas rellenas
fi: Täytekeksit
fr: Biscuits fourrés
hr: Filovani keks
it: Biscotti ripieni
lt: Įdaryti sausainiai
nl: Gevulde biscuits
pt: Biscoitos recheados
ro: Biscuiți umpluți

en: Sandwich biscuits
de: Doppelkekse
fr: Biscuits sandwich

en: Chocolate sandwich cookies, Biscuit (cookie) snack with dairy or vanilla filling
de: Kakao Kekse gefüllt mit Vanillegeschmack
es: Galletas de cacao rellenas de crema
fi: Kreemitäytteinen kaakaokeksi, Kaakaotäytekeksit
fr: Biscuits cacaotés fourrés goût vanille, biscuits cacaotés fourrés, biscuit lait vanille
hr: Čokoladni sendvič Keksi
it: Biscotti al cacao ripieni di crema, Biscotti a sandwich di cioccolato
nl: Cacaokoekjes met een vanillesmaakvulling, Geperste chocoladekoekjes

en: Filled drop cookies
fi: Täytetyt pikkuleivät
fr: Cookies fourrés
hr: Punjeni drop cookies

en: Sponge cake biscuits with fruits covering, Sponge cake biscuits wih fruits covering, Pre-packed sponge cake biscuit with fruits covering
fr: Barquettes aux fruits, Biscuit sec avec nappage aux fruits, Génoise avec nappage aux fruits, Barquette avec nappage aux fruits

en: Crêpes dentelle
xx: Crêpes dentelle
fr: Crêpes dentelle
nl: Flinterdunne flensjes
pt: Crepes dentelle

en: Crêpes dentelle with chocolate, Wafer cookie with chocolate
fr: Crêpes dentelle au chocolat
hr: Crêpes dentelle s čokoladom
pt: Crepes dentelle com chocolate

en: Plain crêpes dentelle
fr: Crêpes dentelle natures

en: Strawberry biscuits, Biscuits with strawberry, Biscuit with strawberry
de: Erdbeerkekse
fi: mansikkakeksit
fr: Biscuits à la fraise, biscuit à la fraise
hr: Keksi od jagoda
it: Biscotti alle fragole
lt: Braškių sausainiai, Sausainiai su braškėmis
nl: Aardbeienbiscuits, Aardbeienbiscuit
ro: Biscuiți cu căpșuni
zh: 草莓饼干

en: Chocolate biscuits, Biscuit with chocolate
bg: Шоколадови бисквити
ca: Galetes de xocolata
da: Chokoladekiks
de: Schokoladenkekse
es: Galletas de chocolate
fi: suklaakeksit
fr: Biscuits au chocolat, biscuit au chocolat, biscuit chocolaté, biscuits chocolatés, biscuits goût chocolat, biscuits saveur chocolat, Biscuit sec au chocolat
he: ביסקוויט שוקולד, ופל שוקולד, ואפל שוקולד, בפלה שוקולה, באפלה שוקולד
hr: Čokoladni keksi
hu: Csokoládés kekszek
it: Biscotti al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai sausainiai, Sausainiai su šokoladu
nl: Chocolade koekjes, Chocolade koekje, Chocoladebiscuits, Chocoladebiscuit
pt: Biscoitos de chocolate
ro: Biscuiți cu ciocolată
ru: Шоколадное печенье
tr: Çikolatalı bisküvi
zh: 巧克力饼干

en: White chocolate biscuits
de: Kekse mit weisser Schokolade
es: Galletas de chocolate blanco
fi: Valkosuklaakeksit
fr: Biscuits au chocolat blanc
he: ביסקוויטים משוקולד לבן
hr: Keksi od bijele čokolade
it: Biscotti al cioccolato bianco
lt: Balto šokolado sausainiai, Sausainiai su baltu šokoladu
nl: Witte chocoladebiscuits, Witte chocoladebiscuit
ro: Biscuiți cu ciocolată albă

en: Milk chocolate biscuits
de: Kekse mit Milchschokolade
es: Galletas de chocolate con leche, Galletas con chocolate con leche
fi: maitosuklaakeksit
fr: Biscuits au chocolat au lait
hr: Keksi od mliječne čokolade
it: Biscotti al cioccolato al latte
lt: Pieniško šokolado sausainiai, Sausainiai su pienišku šokoladu
nl: Melkchocoladebiscuits, Melkchocoladebiscuit
pt: Biscoitos de chocolate de leite
ro: Biscuiți cu ciocolată cu lapte
tr: Sütlü çikolatalı bisküvi

en: Dark chocolate biscuits
de: Kekse mit Bitterschokolade
es: Galletas de chocolate negro
fi: keksit tummalla suklaalla
fr: Biscuits au chocolat noir
hr: Keksi od tamne čokolade
it: Biscotti al cioccolato fondente
lt: Juodo šokolado sausainiai, Sausainiai su juodu šokoladu
nl: Pure chocoladebiscuits, Pure chocoladebiscuit
ro: Biscuiți cu ciocolată neagră

en: Digestives covered with chocolate
fr: Sablés nappés de chocolat

en: Stick biscuits covered with chocolate
fr: Biscuits bâtonnets au chocolat

en: Biscuit with a chocolate bar covering, Cookie with a chocolate bar covering
es: Galletas con tableta de chocolate
fr: Biscuits tablette de chocolat, Petits beurres au chocolat, Biscuits avec tablette de chocolat, Biscuit sec avec tablette de chocolat
hr: Biskvit s preljevom od čokolade
it: Biscotti con tavoletta di cioccolato

en: Biscuit with a filled chocolate bar covering, Cookie with a filled chocolate bar covering
fr: Biscuits tablette fourrée